Hawaii statutes.
[§206E-34 Cultural public market.]
(a) There shall be established within the Hawaii community development
authority a state cultural public market.

(b) The cultural public market shall be
located on state land within the Kakaako Makai area and developed pursuant to
sections 206E-31, 206E-32, and 206E-33. A public parking lot shall be
included.

(c) The Hawaii community development authority
shall:

(1) Designate and develop the state-owned land for
the cultural public market;

(2) Accept, for consideration, input regarding the
establishment of the cultural public market from the following departments and
agencies:

(A) The department of agriculture;

(B) The department of business, economic
development, and tourism;

(C) The department of land and natural
resources;

(D) The department of labor and industrial
relations; and

(E) The Hawaii tourism authority;

(3) Consider and determine the propriety of using
public-private partnerships in the development and operation of the cultural
public market;

(4) Develop, distribute, and accept requests for
proposals from private entities for plans to develop and operate the cultural
public market; and

(5) Ensure that the Hawaiian culture is the featured
culture in the cultural public market.

(d) Requests for proposals for the cultural
public market shall contemplate but not be limited to the inclusion of the
following types of facilities and services:

(1) Retail outlets for ethnically diverse products;

(2) Venues for businesses with ethnic themes, including
restaurants and other service-related businesses;

(3) Theaters, stages, and arenas designed to showcase
cultural performing artists as well as community performing arts;

(4) Exhibition space or museums that showcase artwork
created by international and local artists; and

(5) Museums or other educational facilities focusing
on the history and cultures of the various ethnic groups within Hawaii,
including Hawaiian history. [L 2005, c 231, §2]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next